District of Columbia statutes.
7-1614

Designation of an initiative coordinator.

The Director of the Department of Health shall designate an initiative coordinator, who shall be an employee of the Department of Health and qualified by experience and training to administer the initiative.

Mar. 20, 2008, D.C. Law 17-117, § 5, 55 DCR 1282